Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.425

Offenders—Postrelease violations.

(1) Whenever the board or a community corrections officer of this state has reason to believe an offender released under RCW 9.95.420, * 10.95.030(3), or 9.94A.730 has violated a condition of community custody or the laws of this state, any community corrections officer may arrest or cause the arrest and detention of the offender pending a determination by the board whether sanctions should be imposed or the offender's community custody should be revoked. The community corrections officer shall report all facts and circumstances surrounding the alleged violation to the board, with recommendations.

(2) If the board or the department causes the arrest or detention of an offender for a violation that does not amount to a new crime and the offender is arrested or detained by local law enforcement or in a local jail, the board or department, whichever caused the arrest or detention, shall be financially responsible for local costs. Jail bed costs shall be allocated at the rate established under RCW 9.94A.740.

[ 2014 c 130 s 5; 2009 c 28 s 30; 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 307.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 10.95.030 was amended by 2023 c 102 s 20, changing subsection (3) to subsection (2).

Application—Effective date—2014 c 130: See notes following RCW 9.94A.510.

Effective date—2009 c 28: See note following RCW 2.24.040.

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.